Utah statutes.
31A-22-501.   Eligible groups.

A group or blanket policy of life insurance may not be delivered in Utah unless the insured group:

(1)  falls within at least one of the classifications under Sections 31A-22-501.1 through 31A-22-509; and

(2)  is formed for a reason other than the purchase of insurance.



Amended by Chapter 125, 2005 General Session

